Tennessee, session 114, HB0336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-10-212(a)(2), is amended by
deleting "four percent (4%) of all candidates" and substituting "five percent (5%) of all
candidates".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0336
001933
- 1 -